District of Columbia statutes.
51-136

Disclosure of information pertaining to domestic violence claimant.

The release of information pertaining to a domestic violence claimant, in addition to the requirements of § 51-113, shall require that:

(1)

The Director notify the claimant prior to the release of any information;

(2)

The Director shall take reasonable actions to prevent the unnecessary disclosure of personal identifiers, such as the claimant’s address, from information otherwise required to be disclosed by law; and

(3)

Further dissemination of the information released shall be prohibited.

Aug. 28, 1935, ch. 794, § 36
as added June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-171, § 2(b), 51 DCR 4701